src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_NUÕLSTED !!= * @CODE@ nuõlsted:nuõllâst

:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! nuõllâst
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! nuõllâst
:%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! nuõlsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! nuõllsted

LEXICON V_TAARBŠED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
+V: V0_TAARBŠED ;
LEXICON IV_TAARBŠED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
+V+IV: V0_TAARBŠED ;
LEXICON TV_TAARBŠED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš
+V+TV: V0_TAARBŠED ;
LEXICON V0_TAARBŠED !!= * @CODE@ taarbšed:taarbâš

! No Gradation
! similar_to: V_KÄIGGŠED
! ž:š
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;	! taarbâš
:%^VC VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        	! taarbâž
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                  ! taarbšed

LEXICON V_ǨIÕRGGNED
+V: V0_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
LEXICON IV_ǨIÕRGGNED
+V+IV: V0_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
LEXICON TV_ǨIÕRGGNED
+V+TV: V0_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
LEXICON V0_ǨIÕRGGNED
! Gradation: none
! ǩiõrggned:ǩiõrggân
! (ij ǩiõrggân) %^RmVow
! ǩiõrggned:ǩiõrggân
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: ǩiõrggned
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩiõrggan
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩiõrggne
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ǩiõrggne
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: ǩiõrggân
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: ǩiõrggnež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ǩiõrggnââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ǩiõrggnuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! ǩiõrggan
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! ǩiõrggân
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;           ! ǩiõrggned



!! !CLASS 2 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION
LEXICON V_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
+V: V0_VUEJTED ;
LEXICON IV_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
+V+IV: V0_VUEJTED ;
LEXICON TV_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat
+V+TV: V0_VUEJTED ;
LEXICON V0_VUEJTED !!= * @CODE@ vuejted:vuejat

! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@'' 
! FORMS
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuejat
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3  ;  !2 vuejat

! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2:  vuejat
!   V.Imprt.2.ConNeg, V.Ind.Prs.ConNeg
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;

! (1) +V+Inf: vuejted
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuejte
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuejte
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: vuejtež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: vuejtââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: vuejtuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc

!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3
+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:	K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:		K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: 	K ;

LEXICON VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE
+Inf:%>ed K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ep  K  ; 
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>eʹped K  ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>e     K  ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e              K  ; ! vuejte
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am  K  ;  ! vuejtam
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak  K  ; !
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>et K ; !

+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em             K  ; ! vuejtem
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ             K  ; ! vuejtiǩ
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i              K  ; ! ! vuejti
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im             K  ; ! ! vuejtim
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id             K  ; ! ! vuejtid
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ; ! vuejteš
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>am K ; ! vuejtam

+Imprt+Sg3:%>ââǥǥas          K  ; !WG
+Imprt+Pl1:%>âkap                    K  ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>eʹǩed           K  ;
+Imprt+Pl3:%>âkaz            K  ;

+Imprt+ConNegII:%>uku K ;
+Imprt+ConNegII+Use/NG:%>uku K ;
:%>eʹ		VSUF-I-POTKOND ; !WG
+Pot+Sg3:%>ež	K ; !WG
+ActEss:%>eʹmen K ;
+Actio:%>em K ;
+Actio:%>em N_PEʹRRJEM ;
+Act+PrsPrc:%>eei K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Der/N:%>ee N_TUÕĐŠTEEI ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>am K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>ummu K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>uum K ;
:e VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
+Der/mmuš:%>ummuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
+Err/Orth+Der/muš:%>umuš N_MAINSTUMMUŠ ;
+Der/škueʹtted:%>e»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
+Der/âʹtted:âtt TV_SOLLÂʹTTED ;
+Der/âʹstted:âstt V_CEʹPCCED ;

LEXICON V_KÄIGGŠED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
+V: V0_KÄIGGŠED ;
LEXICON IV_KÄIGGŠED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
+V+IV: V0_KÄIGGŠED ;
LEXICON TV_KÄIGGŠED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš
+V+TV: V0_KÄIGGŠED ;
LEXICON V0_KÄIGGŠED !!= * @CODE@ käiggšed:käiggaš

! No Gradation
! ž:š
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;	! käiggaš
:%^VC VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        	! käiggaž
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                  ! käiggšed


LEXICON V_JÄLSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
+V: V0_JÄLSTED ;
LEXICON IV_JÄLSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
+V+IV: V0_JÄLSTED ;
LEXICON TV_JÄLSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast
+V+TV: V0_JÄLSTED ;
LEXICON V0_JÄLSTED !!= * @CODE@ jälsted:jäälast

! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
!
! * Yaml: __V-jaelsted__

:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! jäälast
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;      	 ! jäälast
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 		 ! jälsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 		 ! jäälsted


LEXICON V_PÅǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
+V: V0_PÅǤSTED ;
LEXICON IV_PÅǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
+V+IV: V0_PÅǤSTED ;
LEXICON TV_PÅǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast
+V+TV: V0_PÅǤSTED ;
LEXICON V0_PÅǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ påǥsted:pååǥǥast

! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-poagsted__
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! pååǥǥast
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;      	 ! pååǥǥast
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 		 ! påǥsted
+Err/Orth:%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 	 ! pååǥsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; 	 ! pååǥǥsted

LEXICON V_JÅRǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
+V: V0_JÅRǤSTED ;
LEXICON IV_JÅRǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
+V+IV: V0_JÅRǤSTED ;
LEXICON TV_JÅRǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast
+V+TV: V0_JÅRǤSTED ;
LEXICON V0_JÅRǤSTED !!= * @CODE@ jårǥsted:jåårǥast

! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-poagsted__
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! jåårǥast
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! jåårǥast
:%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                 ! jårǥsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;                 ! jåårǥsted

LEXICON V_TEÂPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâppast
+V: V0_TEÂPSTED ;
LEXICON IV_TEÂPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâppast
+V+IV: V0_TEÂPSTED ;
LEXICON TV_TEÂPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâppast
+V+TV: V0_TEÂPSTED ;
LEXICON V0_TEÂPSTED !!= * @CODE@ teâpsted:teâppast

!! gradation: no
!! allegro: yes
!! similar_to: 
! lexicon ''@LEXNAME@''
! * Yaml: __V-teapsted__
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! teâppast
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! teâppast
:%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;  ! teâpsted
+Use/NG:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;    ! teâppsted

LEXICON V_ŠORRNED !!= * @CODE@ šorrned:šorran
+V: V0_ŠORRNED ;
LEXICON IV_ŠORRNED !!= * @CODE@ šorrned:šorran
+V+IV: V0_ŠORRNED ;
LEXICON TV_ŠORRNED !!= * @CODE@ šorrned:šorran
+V+TV: V0_ŠORRNED ;
LEXICON V0_ŠORRNED !!= * @CODE@ šorrned:šorran
!! gradation: no
! (ij šorran) %^RmVow
! šorrned:šorran
! FORMS
! (1) +V+Inf: šorrned
!   Ind.Prs.Pl1-Pl2, Ind.Prt.ConNeg
!   Imprt.Pl1-Pl2-Pl3, ActEss, Actio, PrsPrc, PrfPrc
! (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šorran
! (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: šorrne
! (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: šorrne
!   Ind.Prt.Sg1-Sg2-4
! (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: šorrân
!   Ind.Prs.Sg1-Sg2-4-ConNeg
!   Ind.Prt.Sg3-Pl1-Pl2
!   Imprt.2.ConNeg
!   VAbe, GerTemp, GerInstr
!   Cond-Pot
! (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: šorrnež
! (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: šorrnââǥǥas
! (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: šorrnuku
!    Pass.PrfPrc
:%^PenVow2a VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ; ! šorran
: VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;        ! šorran
:%^RmVow VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;  	 ! šorrned


!! !CLASS 2 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION


LEXICON V_ČIEʹǨRDED !!= * @CODE@ čieʹǩrded:čieʹǩǩerd
+V: V0_ČIEʹǨRDED ;
LEXICON IV_ČIEʹǨRDED !!= * @CODE@ čieʹǩrded:čieʹǩǩerd
+V+IV: V0_ČIEʹǨRDED ;
LEXICON TV_ČIEʹǨRDED !!= * @CODE@ čieʹǩrded:čieʹǩǩerd
+V+TV: V0_ČIEʹǨRDED ;
