src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
aaibšed:aaibâš V_TAARBŠED ;
arvvled:arvvâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
ceârted:ceârat V_VUEJTED ;
ceäksted:ceäkkast V_TEÂPSTED ;
cilggled:cilggâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
coolted:coolat V_VUEJTED ;
counnled:counnâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
cuäʹlǩsted:cuäʹlǩast V_ŠORRNED ;
cuåkkled:cuåkkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
cõggned:cõggân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
dõndõõkkled:dõndõõkkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
happned:happân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
heälted:heälat V_VUEJTED ;
himjjled:himjjâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
hiškkled:hiškkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
huânnʼned:huânˈnan V_VUEJTED ;
huânted:huânat V_ŠORRNED ;
häikkšed:häikkaš V_ŠORRNED ;
hõrršed:hõrrâš V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
iilbšed:iilbâš V_TAARBŠED ;
irrsmed:irrâsm V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
jaukkled:jaukkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
jeärsmed:jeärasm V_ŠORRNED ;
joottled:joottâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
juʹrddled:juʹrddâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
jälsted:jäälast V_JÄLSTED ;
jäävvted:jäävvat V_ŠORRNED ;
jårgsted:jåårgast V_JÅRǤSTED ;
jårǥsted:jåårǥast V_JÅRǤSTED ;
kaggled:kaggâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
kalggled:kalggâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
kaʹđđsted:kaʹđđâst V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
kokkned:kokkan V_VUEJTED ;
kokkšed:kokkâš V_TAARBŠED ;
koozzted:koozzat V_ŠORRNED ;
kruŋkksted:kruŋkkâst V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
kuâlŋŋned:kuâlŋŋan V_ŠORRNED ;
kuâssted:kuâssat V_ŠORRNED ;
kuälkkted:kuälkkat V_ŠORRNED ;
kuälsted:kuällast V_TEÂPSTED ;
kuärsted:kuärast V_ŠORRNED ;
kuålkkled:kuålkkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
kââjjted:kââjjat V_ŠORRNED ;
kâʹrdsted:kâʹrdast V_ŠORRNED ;
kädsted:kääddast V_PÅǤSTED ;
käiggšed:käiggâš V_TAARBŠED ;
kåblned:kåblan V_ŠORRNED ;
kåʒsted:kåʒast V_ŠORRNED ;
kõrrned:kõrrân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
kõummsted:kõummâst V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
leksted:lekast V_ŠORRNED ;
leâukted:leâukat V_ŠORRNED ;
liuggned:liuggân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
lossned:lossân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
lueǯǯned:lueǯǯan V_ŠORRNED ;
luõddned:luõdˈdân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
lâssned:lâssan V_ŠORRNED ;
låssned:låssan V_ŠORRNED ;
låʹnsted:lååʹnast V_JÅRǤSTED ;
meäčkted:meäčkat V_ŠORRNED ;
miõckkned:miõckkân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
moojjšed:moojjâš V_TAARBŠED ;
mâŋŋned:mâŋŋan V_ŠORRNED ;
mättʼted:mättat V_VUEJTED ;
mäŋgsted:määŋgast V_JÅRǤSTED ;
mååjjmed:mååjjam V_VUEJTED ;
njaakkled:njaakkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
njekkned:njekkan V_VUEJTED ;
njeâblted:njeâblat V_ŠORRNED ;
njiõjjled:njiõjjâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
njuâckted:njuâckat V_VUEJTED ;
njuäckted:njuäckat V_ŠORRNED ;
njâlddšed:njâlddaš V_ŠORRNED ;
njâʹmmšed:njâʹmmaš V_ŠORRNED ;
noskkted:noskkat V_ŠORRNED ;
notkkled:notkkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
nânsmed:nâânasm V_JÄLSTED ;
nâʹdsted:nâʹdast V_ŠORRNED ;
occned:occan V_VUEJTED ;
ođđned:ođđân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
pahččned:pahččân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
persted:perast V_ŠORRNED ;
peâlted:peâlat V_VUEJTED ;
peäčkted:peäčkat V_ŠORRNED ;
pickkled:pickkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
piõdggned:piõdggân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
puâllted:puâlˈlat V_ŠORRNED ;
pâššned:pâššan V_ŠORRNED ;
påårǥted:påårǥat V_VUEJTED ;
pååssled:pååssal V_ŠORRNED ;
pååđted:pååđat V_VUEJTED ;
påǥsted:pååǥǥast V_PÅǤSTED ;
põõssled:põõssâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
rensted:reenast V_JÄLSTED ;
ruäčkted:ruäčkat V_ŠORRNED ;
ruõssled:ruõssâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
rääskted:rääskat V_ŠORRNED ;
salkkned:salkkân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
seâlsted:seâllast V_TEÂPSTED ;
skuälted:skuälat V_ŠORRNED ;
soorčted:soorčat V_VUEJTED ;
suukkled:suukkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
suâibted:suâibat V_VUEJTED ;
säärnted:säärnat V_ŠORRNED ;
taarbšed:taarbâš V_TAARBŠED ;
taiǥšed:taiǥâš V_TAARBŠED ;
teâpsted:teâppast V_TEÂPSTED ;
teäggted:teäggat V_ŠORRNED ;
tiârrled:tiârrâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
tolvsted:toolvast V_JÅRǤSTED ;
tuejjted:tuejjat V_VUEJTED ;
tuejsted:tuejjast V_TEÂPSTED ;
turccled:turccâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
tuämted:tuämat V_ŠORRNED ;
tâvvned:tâvvan V_ŠORRNED ;
tõrršed:tõrrâš V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
varjjled:varjjâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
veärggted:veärggat V_ŠORRNED ;
viõrrled:viõrrâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
vuejjled:vuejjal V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
vuejted:vuejat V_VUEJTED ;
vuârnted:vuârnat V_VUEJTED ;
vuäjted:vuäjat V_ŠORRNED ;
vuäǥsted:vuäǥǥast V_TEÂPSTED ;
vuäʹpsted:vuäʹppest V_ČIEʹǨRDED ;
vuõlggled:vuõlggâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
vââjšed:vââjaš V_ŠORRNED ;
välsted:väälast V_JÄLSTED ;
âlddned:âlddan V_VUEJTED ;
âllned:âllan V_ŠORRNED ;
äbsted:ääbbast V_PÅǤSTED ;
årsted:årast V_ŠORRNED ;
õõmšed:õõmâš V_TAARBŠED ;
čeäǥǥted:čeäǥǥat V_ŠORRNED ;
čieʹǩrded:čieʹǩǩerd V_ČIEʹǨRDED ;
čuälǥted:čuälǥat V_ŠORRNED ;
čuåkkled:čuåkkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
čuõvvned:čuõvˈvân V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
šarggled:šarggâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
šeälted:šeälat V_VUEJTED ;
šlåkkted:šlåkkat V_ŠORRNED ;
špiâkkled:špiâkˈkâl V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
ǩeârršed:ǩeârraš V_ŠORRNED ;
ǩiâpsmed:ǩiâpâsm V_ǨIÕRGGNED ;
ǩiârršed:ǩiârrâš V_TAARBŠED ;
